Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 7 Licensure of Adult Day Center

Cross references.

Protection of disabled adults and elder persons, §

30-5-1

et seq.

Disclosure of treatment of Alzheimer’s Disease or Alzheimer’s related dementia, § 31-8-180 et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 3(b), not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this article, as enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1 as Code Sections 49-6-80 through 49-6-85, shall become effective July 1 of the fiscal year following the year in which funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of this Act in an appropriations Act making specific reference to this Act and shall become effective when funds so appropriated become available for expenditure. Funds were appropriated at the 2007 session of the General Assembly.

49-6-80.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Adult Day Center for Aging Adults Licensure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1.

49-6-81.
Legislative intent.

The intent of the General Assembly is to promote, safeguard, and protect the well-being of adults participating in adult day care or adult day health services by authorizing, promoting, and supporting licensure regulations for adult day care and adult day health services providers. It is further the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Community Health shall serve as the agency responsible for promulgating, implementing, and enforcing the licensure regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

49-6-82.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Adult day care” means the provision of a comprehensive plan of services that meets the needs of aging adults, as defined in paragraph (4) of this Code section, under a social model, as defined in paragraph (9) of this Code section. This term shall not include programs which provide day habilitation and treatment services exclusively for individuals with developmental disabilities.

“Adult day center” means a facility serving aging adults that provides adult day care or adult day health services, as defined in paragraphs (1) and (3) of this Code section, for compensation, to three or more persons. This term shall not include a respite care services program.

“Adult day health services” means the provision of a comprehensive plan of services that meets the needs of aging adults under a medical model, as defined in paragraph (6) of this Code section. This term shall not include programs which provide day habilitation and treatment services exclusively for individuals with developmental disabilities.

“Aging adults” means persons 60 years of age or older or mature adults below the age of 60 whose needs and interests are substantially similar to persons 60 years of age or older who have physical or mental limitations that restrict their abilities to perform the normal activities of daily living and impede independent living.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Medical model” means a comprehensive program that provides aging adults with the basic social, rehabilitative, health, and personal care services needed to sustain essential activities of daily living and to restore or maintain optimal capacity for self-care. Such program of care shall be based on individual plans of care and shall be provided for less than 24 hours per day.

“Primary caregiver” means the one identified relative or other person in a relationship of responsibility, such as an agent under a valid durable power of attorney for health care, a health care agent under a valid advance directive for health care, or a mental health care agent under a valid psychiatric advance directive, who has assumed the primary responsibility for the provision of care needed to maintain the physical or mental health of an aging adult, who lives in the same residence with such individual, and who does not receive financial compensation for the care provided.

“Respite care services program” means a program for aging adults who can function in a group setting and who can feed and toilet themselves with or without the assistance of a personal aide accompanying them which:

Is operated by a nonprofit organization;

Provides no more than 25 hours of services per week;

Is managed by a director who has completed an adult day care services training and orientation program approved by the department;

Is staffed primarily by volunteers; and

Has as its sole purpose to provide primary caregivers of aging adults with relief from normal caregiving duties and responsibilities.

“Social model” means a program that addresses primarily the basic social and recreational activities needed to be provided to aging adults, but also provides, as required, limited personal care assistance, supervision, or assistance essential for sustaining the activities of daily living. Such programs of care shall be based on individual plans of care and shall be provided for less than 24 hours per day.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 537, § 1/HB 1044; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-31/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in paragraph (7), substituted “health care, a health care agent” for “health care or health care agent”, and inserted “or a mental health care agent under a valid psychiatric advance directive,”.

49-6-83.
License required; nontransferable.

No person, business entity, corporation, or association, whether operated for profit or not for profit, shall operate an adult day center without first obtaining a license or a provisional license from the department. A license issued under this article shall not be assignable or transferable.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1.

49-6-84.
Authority of department; promulgation of rules and regulations; authority to issue or suspend licenses.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this article utilizing the public rule-making process to elicit input from consumers, providers, and advocates. The department is further authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses or take other enforcement actions against licensees or applicants as provided in Code Section 31-2-8. All rules and regulations and any enforcement actions initiated by the department shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-56/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Code Section 31-2-8” for “Code Section 31-2-11” in the second sentence of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

49-6-85.
Periodic inspection by department; exemptions.

An adult day center for which an application for a license has been submitted or to which a license has been issued shall be inspected by the department periodically and as determined necessary to monitor such center’s compliance with applicable laws and regulations; provided, however, the department may exempt a center from inspection if such center has been certified or accredited by a certification or accreditation entity recognized and approved by the department if such entity uses standards that are substantially similar to those established by the department. A center seeking exemption from inspection shall be required to submit to the department documentation of certification or accreditation, including a copy of its most recent certification or accreditation inspection report, which shall be maintained by the department as a public record.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 1.

49-6-86.
Reasonable fees for licensure of adult day centers; use of fees.

The department shall be authorized to charge reasonable application fees, license fees, renewal fees, or other similar fees relating to the licensure of adult day centers in an amount established by the board pursuant to rules and regulations. The board shall take into consideration input from consumers, providers of adult day health services, and advocates during the rule-making process to establish such fees. If so appropriated by the General Assembly, the fees shall be used to support the licensing, inspecting, and monitoring of adult day centers. Fees may be refunded by the department for good cause, as determined by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 348, § 2/HB 505; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 49/HB 737.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “rule-making” for “rulemaking” in the second sentence.